Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3318
Veterinary technician, defined.

Veterinary technician means an individual who has received a degree in veterinary technology from an approved veterinary technician program or its equivalent.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1100.